tables/ur-pk-g2.ctb
word \x067E\x06BE\x0650\x0631 235                                          P8ER                6          
word \x062A\x06A9 1256                                                     TK                  [backslash]
word \x062C\x0628 356                                                      JB                  J          
word \x062C\x0628\x06A9\x06C1 245-13                                       JBKH                JK                    Using contraction for JB and KH together        
word \x0627\x0648\x0631 136                                                AWR                 U          
lowword \x0628\x06BE\x06CC 23                                              B8I                 2
word \x0679\x0650\x06BE\x06CC\x06A9 135                                    [E8IK               O          
word \x0679\x06BE\x06CC\x06A9 135                                          [8IK                O          
# word \x0645\x06AF\x0631 2356                                               MGR                 7                     Contraction correct but better to ignore
# endword \x0648\x0646\x06AF 2356                                            WNG                 7                     Contraction correct but better to ignore
word \x062D\x0627\x0635\x0650\x0644 156                                    :A&EL               :

midword \x0020\x0648\x0020 36                                              spaceWspace         -                      join words with hyphen

word \x062F\x0650\x0626\x06D2 145-24-34                                    DE'/                DI/                     Added 2020-10-01
word \x06A9\x0650\x0626\x06D2 13-24-34                                     KE'/                KI/                     Added 2020-10-01

# New Ones
word \x0639\x0631\x0636 12356                                              (R$                  (          

# Dot 5 Signs
always \x0622\x0626\x0646\x062F\x06C1 5-345                                >'NDH               ">          
noback always \x0627\x0653\x0626\x0646\x062F\x06C1 5-345                   >'NDH               ">                   Added 2020-02-25
noback always \x0622\x064A\x0654\x0646\x062F\x06C1 5-345                   >'NDH               ">                   Added 2020-02-25
noback always \x0627\x0653\x064A\x0654\x0646\x062F\x06C1 5-345             >'NDH               ">                   Added 2020-02-25
noback always \x0622\x06CC\x0646\x062F\x06C1 5-345                         >INDH               ">           added 2020-10-08
noback always \x0622\x0654\x0646\x062F\x06C1 5-345                         >'NDH               ">          
noback always \x0627\x0653\x0654\x0646\x062F\x06C1 5-345                   >'NDH               ">                   Added 2020-02-25
begword \x067E\x0631\x0648 5-1234                                          PRW                 "P          
always \x062A\x06CC\x0631 5-2345                                           TIR                 "T          
begword \x062C\x0646\x06A9 5-245                                           JNK                 "J          
always \x0686\x0627\x0631 5-14                                             CAR                 "C          
always \x062D\x0627\x0644 5-156                                            :AL                 ":          
sufword \x062E\x064F\x0648\x0634 5-1346                                    XUW%                "X          
always \x062F\x0627\x0631 5-145                                            DAR                 "D          
always \x0688\x0627\x0644 5-346                                            +AL                 "+          
always \x0630\x0631\x06CC\x0630 5-2346                                     !RI(                "!          
always \x0631\x0648\x0632 5-1235                                           RWZ                 "R          
word \x06A9\x0648\x0626\x06CC 5-12456                                      KW'I                ")          
noback word \x06A9\x0648\x064A\x0654\x06CC 5-12456                         KW'I                ")                   Added 2020-02-25
sufword \x0633\x0627\x0631 5-234                                           SAR                 "S          corrected 04-01-2018
always \x0634\x0627\x062F 5-146                                            %AD                 "%          
always \x0635\x0627\x062D\x0650\x0628 5-12346                              &A:EB               "&          
always \x0636\x0631\x064F\x0648\x0631 5-1246                               $RUWR               "$          
sufword \x0637\x0631\x0641 5-23456                                         )RF                 ")          
always \x0638\x0627\x06C1\x0650\x0631 5-123456                             =AHER               "=          
always \x0639\x0627\x0645 5-12356                                          (AM                 "(          
always \x063A\x064E\x06CC\x0631 5-126                                      <2IR                "<          
always \x0641\x0631\x0642 5-124                                            FRQ                 "F          
always \x0642\x0631\x0650\x06CC\x0628 5-12345                              QREIB               "Q          
always \x0642\x0631\x06CC\x0628 5-12345                                    QRIB                "Q          
always \x06A9\x0627\x0631 5-13                                             KAR                 "K          
always \x06AF\x064F\x0632\x0631 5-1245                                     GUZR                "G          
word \x0644\x0650\x0626\x06D2 5-123                                        LE'/                "L          
noback word \x0644\x0650\x064A\x0654\x06D2 5-123                           LE'/                "L                   Added 2020-02-25
noback word \x06A9\x0648\x064A\x0654\x06CC 5-12456                         KW'I                ")                   Added 2020-02-25
always \x0644\x06CC\x0626\x06D2 5-123                                      LI'/                "L          
noback always \x0644\x06CC\x064A\x0654\x06D2 5-123                         LI'/                "L                   Added 2020-02-25
always \x0645\x06CC\x0631 5-134                                            MIR                 "M          
always \x0646\x0638\x0631 5-1345                                           N=R                 "N          
partword \x0648\x0627\x0631 5-2456                                         WAR                 "W          
word \x06C1\x06CC\x06BA 5-125                                              HI;                 "H          
word \x06C1\x064E\x06CC\x06BA 5-125                                        H1I;                "H          
sufword \x06CC\x0642\x0650\x06CC\x0646 5-24                                IQEIN               "I
sufword \x06CC\x0642\x06CC\x0646 5-24                                      IQIN                "I
always \x062A\x06BE\x0648\x0691 5-1256                                     T8W]                "[backslash]
always \x0679\x064E\x06BE\x06CC\x0631 5-135                                [81IR               "O                   appears as [18IR in text file   
always \x0679\x06BE\x06C1\x0631 5-135                                      [8HR                "O
always \x0686\x06BE\x0648\x0691 5-16                                       C8W]                "*          
# New Ones
always \x062B\x0648\x0627\x0628 5-1456                                     ?WAB                "?          
prfword \x06CC\x0648\x06BA 5-34                                            IW;                 "/
noback prfword \x06CC\x064F\x0648\x06BA 5-34                               IUW;                "/                   Added 2020-02-25

# Dot 45 Signs
always \x0622\x06C1\x0650\x0633\x062A\x06C1 45-345                         >HESTH              ^>          
always \x0627\x0653\x06C1\x0650\x0633\x062A\x06C1 45-345                   >HESTH              ^>                   Added 2020-02-25
always \x067E\x064F\x06C1\x0646\x0686 45-1234                              PUHNC               ^P          
always \x067E\x06C1\x0648\x064F\x0646\x0686 45-1234                        PHWUNC              ^P          
always \x067E\x06C1\x0646\x0686 45-1234                                    PHNC                ^P
always \x0633\x0650\x0648\x0627 45-234                                     SEWA                ^S          corrected 04-01-2018
always \x062A\x0639\x0644\x0651\x0642 45-2345                              T(,LQ               ^T          appears as T(L,Q in text file
always \x062D\x0642\x06CC\x0642 45-156                                     :QIQ                ^:          
always \x062D\x0642\x0650\x06CC\x0642 45-156                               :QEIQ               ^:
always \x062E\x064F\x0648\x062F 45-1346                                    XUWD                ^X          
always \x062E\x0648\x062F 45-1346                                          XWD                 ^X
always \x06A9\x0648\x0634\x0650\x0634 45-12456                             KW%E%               ^]          
always \x0632\x0650\x0646\x062F\x06AF\x06CC 45-1356                        ZENDGI              ^Z          
always \x0635\x062D\x06CC\x062D 45-12346                                   &:I:                ^&          corrected 25-01-2018
always \x0637\x0631\x0642\x0642 45-23456                                   )RIQ                ^)          
always \x0639\x0651\x0627\x0648\x06C1 45-12356                             (LAWH               ^(          
always \x0642\x0627\x0639\x062F 45-12345                                   QA(D                ^Q          
always \x06A9\x0626\x06CC 45-13                                            K'I                 ^K          
noback always \x06A9\x064A\x0654\x06CC 45-13                                      K'I                 ^K                   Added 2020-02-25
always \x0645\x0639\x0644\x064F\x0648\x0645 45-134                         M(LUWM              ^M          
always \x0646\x0650\x06A9\x0644 45-1345                                    NEKL                ^N          
always \x0648\x0627\x0642\x0639 45-2456                                    WAQ(                ^W          
always \x0648\x0627\x0642\x0650\x0639 45-2456                              WAQE(               ^W
always \x0627\x064F\x067E\x0631 45-136                                     AUPR                ^U          
always \x0627\x064F\x0648\x067E\x0631 45-136                               AURPR               ^U

# New Ones
always \x062B\x0628\x0648\x062A 45-1456                                    ?BWT                ^?          
word \x0634\x0627\x0645\x0644 45-146                                       %AML                ^%          
